Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-4,103
Raptors; violations;
penalty.

Any person violating any provision of section 37-497 or
37-498 shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor. In addition, the court shall order the revocation of the permit of the offender.

Laws 1971, LB 733, § 7;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 206;

Laws 1987, LB 154, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-726;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 213;

Laws 2011, LB41, § 25.